District of Columbia statutes.
24-241.03

Conditions for release.

The Director of the Department of Corrections shall state in writing the terms and conditions under which a person granted work release privileges may be released from actual custody during the time necessary to proceed to the person’s place of employment or other authorized places, perform specified activities, and return to a place of confinement designated by the Director of the Department of Corrections.

History

Nov. 10, 1966, 80 Stat. 1519, Pub. L. 89-803, § 4
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-273, § 4(b), 43 DCR 6168

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-463.
1973 Ed., § 24-463.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-390, August 26, 1996, 43 DCR 4986), § 4(b) of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-436, December 4, 1996, 43 DCR 6651), and § 4(b) of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-35, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1928).